Alaska statutes. Title 36. Public Contracts.
Article 4. Other Procurement Methods.

Sec. 36.30.290.
Electronic bids and proposals.

An agency may allow bids or proposals to be submitted in electronic form under AS 09.80 (Uniform Electronic Transactions Act).

History.

(§ 17 ch 59 SLA 2013)

Sec. 36.30.300.
Single source procurements.

A contract may be awarded for supplies, services, professional services, or construction without competitive sealed bidding, competitive sealed proposals, or other competition in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner. A contract may be awarded under this section only when the chief procurement officer or, for construction contracts or procurements for the state equipment fleet, the commissioner of transportation and public facilities determines in writing that

it is not practicable to award a contract by competitive sealed bidding under AS

36.30.100

, competitive sealed proposals under AS

36.30.200

, or limited competition under AS

36.30.305

; and

award of the contract under this section is in the state’s best interest.

The using agency shall submit written evidence to support a request for a single source procurement. The commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities, as appropriate, may also require the submission of cost or pricing data in connection with an award under this section.

To the extent practicable, the procurement officer shall negotiate with the single source to obtain contract terms advantageous to the state.

Procurement requirements may not be aggregated or structured so as to constitute a purchase under this section or to circumvent the source selection procedures required by AS

36.30.100

—

36.30.270

.

Except for procurements of supplies, services, professional services, or construction that do not exceed the amount for small procurements under AS

36.30.320(a)

as applicable, the authority to make a determination required by this section may not be delegated, even if the authority to contract is delegated under AS

36.30.015(a)

and (b).

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 11 ch 102 SLA 1989; am § 4 ch 37 SLA 1993; am § 20 ch 137 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

For waiver of public bid requirements in areas affected by declared disasters, see AS

44.33.300

.

Administrative Code. —

For single source procurement, see 2 AAC 12, art. 7.

Sec. 36.30.305.
Limited competition procurements.

A construction contract under $100,000, or a contract for supplies, services, or professional services, may be awarded without competitive sealed bidding or competitive sealed proposals, in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner. A contract may be awarded under this section only when the chief procurement officer determines in writing that a situation exists that makes competitive sealed bidding or competitive sealed proposals impractical or contrary to the public interest, except that the attorney general, the public defender, or the director of the office of public advocacy as provided in AS

36.30.015(k)

may make the determination for services of legal counsel, and the commissioner of transportation and public facilities may make the determination for construction contracts under $100,000 or procurements for the state equipment fleet. Procurements under this section shall be made with competition that is practicable under the circumstance. Except for procurements of supplies, services, professional services, or construction that do not exceed the amount for small procurements under AS

36.30.320(a)

, as applicable, the authority to make a determination required by this section may not be delegated.

The using agency shall submit written evidence to support a determination under this section.

Procurement requirements may not be artificially divided, fragmented, aggregated, or structured so as to constitute a purchase under this section or to circumvent the source selection procedures required by AS

36.30.100

—

36.30.270

.

Single source procurements may not be made under this section.

Architectural, engineering, and land survey contracts under AS

36.30.270

may not be made under this section.

History.

(§ 11 ch 65 SLA 1987; am § 12 ch 102 SLA 1989; am § 5 ch 37 SLA 1993; am §§ 21, 22 ch 137 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 79 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For limited competition procurements, see 2 AAC 12, art. 8.

Sec. 36.30.308.
Innovative procurements.

A contract may be awarded for supplies, services, professional services, or construction using an innovative procurement process, with or without competitive sealed bidding or competitive sealed proposals, in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner. A contract may be awarded under this section only when the chief procurement officer, or, for construction contracts or procurements of the state equipment fleet, the commissioner of transportation and public facilities, determines in writing that it is advantageous to the state to use an innovative competitive procurement process in the procurement of new or unique requirements of the state, new technologies, or to achieve best value.

The procurement officer shall submit a procurement plan to the Department of Law for review and approval as to form before issuing the notice required by (c) of this section.

A procurement under this section is subject to the requirements of AS

36.30.130

.

Nothing in this section precludes the adoption of regulations providing for the use of bonuses instead of preferences in a procurement of construction.

History.

(§ 23 ch 137 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For innovative procurement, see 2 AAC 12, art. 11.

Sec. 36.30.309.
Preconstruction services; construction manager general contractor contract.

The department may award by competitive sealed proposals a construction manager general contractor contract in which the department awards a two-phase contract for a construction manager to be responsible for providing preconstruction services during the design phase of the project and, if an agreed-on price for constructing the project is reached, general contractor services during the construction phase. The department may award the contractor providing preconstruction services under the contract with the second phase of the contract to provide construction services in accordance with this section and regulations adopted by the commissioner of transportation and public facilities without any further competitive sealed bidding or competitive sealed proposal process.

A contractor awarded a construction manager general contractor contract under this section is responsible for providing preconstruction services for the applicable project. Once awarded a construction manager general contractor contract, the contractor may negotiate with the department to provide construction services for the applicable project. If the contractor and the department reach an agreed-on price for the construction services under the second phase of the contract, the department shall award the contractor phase two of the contract to provide construction services.

If the contractor providing preconstruction services and the department do not agree on a price for providing construction services, the department may seek an alternative contractor using a process authorized under this chapter. The department may prohibit the contractor providing preconstruction services from participating in the subsequent process.

In this section, “department” means the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities.

History.

(§ 3 ch 22 SLA 2021)

Effective dates. —

Section 3,
ch. 22, SLA 2021 makes this section effective July 15, 2021, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 22, SLA 2021 (HB 160), which added this section, see 2021 House Journal 493 — 494.

Sec. 36.30.310.
Emergency procurements.

Procurements may be made under emergency conditions as defined in regulations adopted by the commissioner when there exists a threat to public health, welfare, or safety, when a situation exists that makes a procurement through competitive sealed bidding or competitive sealed proposals impracticable or contrary to the public interest, or to protect public or private property. An emergency procurement need not be made through competitive sealed bidding or competitive sealed proposals but shall be made with competition that is practicable under the circumstances. A written determination by the chief procurement officer of the basis for the emergency and for the selection of the particular contractor shall be included in the contract file. The written determination must include findings of fact that support the determination. Except when there is insufficient time for the chief procurement officer to make the written determination required by this section, the chief procurement officer may not delegate the authority to make the determination.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 6 ch 37 SLA 1993)

Cross references. —

For waiver of public bid requirements in areas affected by declared disasters, see AS

44.33.300

.

For a temporary provision relating to emergency procurement during a public heath emergency declared by the commissioner of health and social services, see sec. 4, ch. 2, SLA 2021, in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For emergency procurements, see 2 AAC 12, art. 9.

Sec. 36.30.311.
Employment and youth program procurements.

A procurement of products manufactured or services provided by an employment program of the state or an accredited youth education and employment program may be made without competitive sealed bidding or competitive sealed proposals, in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 24 ch 137 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For source selection, see 2 AAC 12, art. 1.

Sec. 36.30.313.
Procurements provided through employment of prison inmates.

A procurement of products or services provided through the employment of prison inmates under AS

33.30.191

may be made without competitive sealed bidding or competitive sealed proposals, in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 24 ch 137 SLA 1996; am § 8 ch 58 SLA 2006)

Sec. 36.30.315.
Determinations; false statements; criminal penalty.

In a determination made by a state official under AS

36.30.300

—

36.30.310

, the state official making the determination shall independently examine the material facts of the procurement and independently determine whether the procurement is eligible for the procurement method requested.

If a state official knowingly makes a false statement in a determination made under AS

36.30.300

—

36.30.310

, the state official is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 7 ch 37 SLA 1993; am § 25 ch 137 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

For provisions related to punishment of misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Administrative Code. —

For single source procurement, see 2 AAC 12, art. 7.

Sec. 36.30.320.
Small procurements.

A procurement for supplies, services, or professional services that does not exceed an aggregate dollar amount of $100,000, construction that does not exceed an aggregate dollar amount of $200,000, or lease of space that does not exceed 7,000 square feet shall be made under regulations adopted by the commissioner for small procurements.

[Repealed, § 48 ch 137 SLA 1996.]

Small procurements need not be made through competitive sealed bidding or competitive sealed proposals but shall be made with competition that is practicable under the circumstances.

Procurement requirements may not be artificially divided or fragmented so as to constitute a purchase under this section or to circumvent the source selection procedures required by AS

36.30.100

—

36.30.270

.

The procurement officer shall give adequate public notice of intent to make a procurement under this section in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 12 ch 65 SLA 1987; am § 13 ch 102 SLA 1989; am § 8 ch 2 FSSLA 1992; am §§ 26, 48 ch 137 SLA 1996; am § 18 ch 59 SLA 2013)

Administrative Code. —

For small purchases, see 2 AAC 12, art. 6.